Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.142

Unaccompanied and homeless youth—Building point of contact—Duty of district liaison for students experiencing homelessness.

(1) Each K-12 public school in the state must establish a building point of contact in each elementary school, middle school, and high school. These points of contact must be appointed by the principal of the designated school and are responsible for identifying homeless and unaccompanied homeless youth and connecting them with the school district's liaison for students experiencing homelessness. The school district homeless student liaison is responsible for training building points of contact.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make available best practices for choosing and training building points of contact to each school district.

[ 2019 c 412 s 3; 2016 c 157 s 5.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Short title—2016 c 157: See notes following RCW 28A.300.540.